da: Kontorforsyning > Præsentationsmaterialer > Præsentationstavler: Tilbehør til opslagstavler; Opslagstavler; Skumplader; Opklæbningsplader; Plakattavler
ko: 사무용품 > 프레젠테이션 용품 > 디스플레이 보드: 게시판 부대용품; 게시판; 폼 보드; 마운팅 보드; 포스터 보드
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Prezentacijski pribor > Ploče za prezentaciju: Pribor za oglasne ploče; Oglasne ploče; Pjenaste ploče; Ploče za uokvirivanje slika i fotografija; Ploče za plakate
ja: オフィス用品 > プレゼン用品 > 展示用ボード・パネル: 掲示板関連用品; 掲示板; ウレタンボード; 台紙; ポスターボード
hu: Irodai kellékek > Prezentációs kellékek > Kijelzőtáblák: Faliújság-kiegészítők; Faliújságok; Habtáblák; Szerelőtáblák; Plakáttáblák
it: Forniture per ufficio > Forniture per presentazioni > Pannelli di visualizzazione: Accessori per bacheche informative; Bacheche; Pannelli di gommapiuma; Pannelli di montaggio; Pannelli per poster
nb: Kontormateriell > Presentasjonsutstyr > Presentasjonstavler: Tilbehør til oppslagstavler; Oppslagstavler; Skumtavler; Monteringstavler; Plakattavler
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pripomočki za predstavitve > Table za predstavitve: Dodatki za oglasne deske; Oglasne deske; Table iz penaste gobe; Montažne table; Table za plakate
de: Bürobedarf > Präsentationsbedarf > Ausstellungstafeln: Zubehör für Anschlagbretter; Pinnwände; Hartschaumstoffplatten; Trägerplatten; Plakatkartons
es: Material de oficina > Accesorios para presentaciones > Paneles de exposición: Accesorios para tablones de anuncios; Tablones de anuncios; Planchas de espuma; Tableros de montaje; Tableros para pósteres
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 簡報用品 > 展示板: 佈告欄配件; 佈告欄; 泡棉板; 裱背板; 海報看板
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Sunum Malzemeleri > Sergi Panoları: İlan Panosu Aksesuarları; Bildiri Panoları; Köpük Panolar; Montaj Panoları; Afiş Panoları
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Консумативи за презентации > Табла: Аксесоари за табла за обяви; Табла за обяви; Пенокартон; Паспарту; Табла за плакати
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์นำเสนองาน > ป้ายนิเทศ: อุปกรณ์กระดานข่าว; กระดานข่าว; บอร์ดโฟม; บอร์ดติดตั้ง; บอร์ดโปสเตอร์
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Suprimentos para apresentações > Quadros de exibição: Acessórios para quadro de avisos; Quadros de avisos; Quadros de espuma; Quadros para montagem; Quadros para pôster
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Consumabile de prezentare > Aviziere: Accesorii pentru panouri cu informații; Panouri cu informații; Plăci din spumă; Plăci pentru montare; Plăci pentru anunțuri
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Matériel de présentation et d'affichage > Affichages: Accessoires pour panneaux d'affichage; Panneaux d'affichage; Plaques en mousse; Cartons à cadre; Tableaux d'affichage
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Materiais de apresentação > Quadros de apresentação: Acessórios para quadros informativos; Quadros de avisos; Quadros de esponja; Placas de montagem; Quadros para pósteres
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Potreby na prezentáciu > Prezentačné tabule: Príslušenstvo k nástenkám; Nástenky; Penové tabule; Kartónové lepenky; Plagátové tabule
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αναλώσιμα παρουσίασης > Πίνακες προβολής: Αξεσουάρ πινακίδων ανακοινώσεων; Πινακίδες ανακοινώσεων; Αφρώδεις πίνακες; Πίνακες στήριξης; Πίνακες αφίσας
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Thiết bị thuyết trình > Bảng hiển thị: Phụ kiện bảng tin; Bảng tin; Tấm xốp; Bảng dán; Bảng gắn áp phích
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sprzęt do prezentacji > Tablice do prezentacji: Akcesoria do tablic biurowych; Tablice informacyjne; Tablice piankowe; Tablice montażowe; Tablice na plakaty
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Товары для проведения презентаций > Презентационные и выставочные доски: Аксессуары для пробковых досок; Пробковые доски; Пенокартон; Картон для наклейки иллюстраций; Плакатный картон
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Pristatymų reikmenys > Ekranai: Skelbimų lentų priedai; Skelbimų lentos; Putplasčio plokštės; Montavimo lentos; Plakatų lentos
en: Office Supplies > Presentation Supplies > Display Boards: Bulletin Board Accessories; Bulletin Boards; Foam Boards; Mounting Boards; Poster Boards
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Prezentační materiály > Výstavní plochy: Příslušenství k nástěnkám; Nástěnky; Pěnové tabule; Montážní desky; Plakátovací plochy
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Presentatiebenodigdheden > Presentatieborden: Accessoires voor prikborden; Prikborden; Schuimrubberborden; Montageborden; Posterborden
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 演示用品 > 展示板: 公告板配件; 公告板; 泡沫板; 安装板/裱褙板; 海报展板
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Presentationsmaterial > Presentationstavlor: Tillbehör för anslagstavlor; Anslagstavlor; Skumgummitavlor; Monteringstavlor; Affischtavlor
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Esitystarvikkeet > Esitystaulut: Ilmoitustaulujen lisätarvikkeet; Korkkitaulut; Nastataulut; Kapalevyt; Julistelehtiöt